Hawaii, session 2025, GM1153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that county neighborhood
and advisory boards provide local communities with opportunities
to participate in government. Likewise, boards created for the
purpose of community outreach, such as the Hawaii county
community development plan action committees, serve as an
intermediary between residents and government leaders to
understand local concerns, gather and disseminate information,
and create solutions in a collaborative environment. However,
because such boards are not specific to one neighborhood, it is
not clear that they are "neighborhood boards" and thus entitled
to use the special provisions set out for neighborhood boards in
part VII of chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes. As community
outreach boards serve as a grassroots tool, ensuring open access
to board activities is essential to thriving communities
statewide.
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Define "community outreach board";
2025-2698 SB869 HDl HMSO

Page 2
S.B. NO. -1
(2) Include community outreach boards in existing
provisions of the sunshine law that relate to
neighborhood boards; and
(3) Authorize neighborhood board and community outreach
board members to attend meetings or presentations
related to official board business statewide.
SECTION 2. Chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by adding a new section to part VII to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§92- Definition. As used in this part, "community
outreach board" means a board established to serve in a
community advisory capacity under a county commission or a
county department."
SECTION 3. Chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by amending the title of part VII to read as follows:
"[-{■] PART VII. [^] NEIGHBORHOOD BOARD; COMMUNITY OUTREACH BOARD"
SECTION 4. Section 92-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending its title and subsections (a) and (b) to
read:
2025-2698 SB869 HDl HMSO 2
■wniiiuiBiiininiiiii

Page 3 S.B. NO. " i
" [-f] §92-81 [-3-] Neighborhood board; community outreach
board; notice and agenda; public input; quorum. (a) [Any
eefltrary provioion i-n thi-s-ohaptor notwithntanding, ]
NotwithstandjaTig any£royis ion dai yii^cha£t^x t^Uie cont^^^y^
the provisions of this part shall apply to neighborhood boards
and community outreach boards overseen by a neighborhood
commission of the city and county of Honolulu, and [ouch] other
neighborhood boards and community outreach boards as may be
created in other counties and overseen by a county-based
commission[—] or county-based department.
(b) The agenda required to be included in written public
notice of a [neighborhood] board meeting may include an
opportunity for the board to receive public input on issues not
specifically noticed for consideration at the forthcoming
meeting."
2. By amending subsection (d) to read:
"(d) A quorum for a meeting of a neighborhood board or
community outreach board shall be required for:
(1) Conducting official board business;
(2) Discussions [pri-or—to] before and related to voting;
and
2025-2698 SB869 HDl HMSO

Page 4
S.B. NO. - ’
(3) Voting required to validate an act of the board as
part of official board business.
A neighborhood board or community outreach board may receive
information or testimony on a matter of official board business
without a quorum; provided that the board shall not make a
decision on the issue. The board members, at the next meeting
of the [fteig4^b©^?feeed] board, shall report the matters presented
as information or testimony."
SECTION 5. Section 92-82, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§92-82 Permitted interactions of neighborhood board and
community outreach board members. (a) Neighborhood board ar^
community outreach board members may attend meetings or
presentations [locat-cd-on Oahu] on matters relating to official
board business; provided that the meeting or presentation is
open to the public, does not charge a fee or require
registration, and is not specifically and exclusively organized
for or directed toward members of the board; [and] provided
further that no member [makoc] shall make a commitment to vote
on any of the issues discussed.
2025-2698 SB869 HDl HMSO
inniiiiiHiiniin

Page 5 S.B. NO. *1
(b) Neighborhood board and community outreach board
members who attend meetings or presentations allowed by
subsection (a) may ask questions relating to official board
business of persons other than fellow board members."
SECTION 6. Section 92-83, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-f-] §92-83 [^] Neighborhood board meeting; community
outreach board meeting; unanticipated events; public interest.
An unanticipated event that occurs after public notice of a
neighborhood board or community outreach board meeting has been
issued, but before the scheduled meeting, may be the subject of
discussion at the scheduled meeting if timely action on the
matter is necessary for public health, welfare, and safety. At
a duly noticed meeting, a board may take action on an
unanticipated event in the public interest that is not on the
agenda in the same manner as if the board had held an emergency
meeting to take action on the issue, pursuant to section 92-8."
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2698 SB869 HDl HMSO

S
j
S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 15th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No. 869, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 16, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 869, SD 1,HD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 2, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives